Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 39. Statewide Crime Stoppers Advisory Council

§ 45-39-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Council” means the Crime Stoppers Advisory Council.

“Local crime stoppers program” means the acceptance and spending of donations by a private, nonprofit organization for the awarding of rewards to persons who report information concerning criminal activity to the organization if the organization:

Operates less than statewide; and

Forwards reported information to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 45-39-3.
Creation.

There is hereby created within the Department of Public Safety the Crime Stoppers Advisory Council. The council shall be composed of five (5) persons appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. At least three (3) of the foregoing appointees shall be persons who have participated in a local crime stoppers program. Each member of the council shall serve for a term of two (2) years or until his successor is appointed and qualifies. At the first meeting of the council, which shall be called by the Governor, and at the first meeting after the beginning of each new state fiscal year, the council shall elect from among its members a chairman and such other officers as the council deems necessary. Each member of the council shall receive per diem in the amount established in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, for each day or portion thereof spent discharging his duties under this chapter and shall receive mileage and expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Expenses of the council shall be paid by the Department of Public Safety out of the State Crime Stoppers Fund, created in Section 45-39-5(4).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 550, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 45-39-5.
Duties; powers and authority.

The council may contract with a person to serve as its director or, with the concurrence of the Commissioner of Public Safety, may employ an individual within the Department of Public Safety to serve as director. The council shall establish the authority and responsibilities of the director.

The council shall:

Advise and assist in the creation of local crime stoppers programs;

Foster the detection of crime and encourage persons to report information about criminal acts;

Encourage news and other media to promote local crime stoppers programs and to inform the public of the functions of the council;

Assist local crime stoppers programs in forwarding information about criminal acts to the appropriate law enforcement agencies; and

Help law enforcement agencies detect and combat crime by increasing the flow of information to and between law enforcement agencies.

The council may adopt rules to carry out its duties under this chapter.

The assessments collected under subsection (5) of Section 99-19-73, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any other funds as may be made available through contributions from private or public sources, shall be deposited in a special fund that is hereby created in the State Treasury and designated the State Crime Stoppers Fund. Monies deposited in the fund shall be expended by the council, pursuant to appropriation therefor by the Legislature, for the authorized purposes of the State Crime Stoppers Program established under this chapter, including, but not limited to, providing reward monies for individuals who legitimately report crime activity. Any such funds paid to such individuals shall be kept confidential by the council, and any audit of the fund and the expenditures of the council shall provide for the confidentiality of any expenditures to such individuals. The Department of Public Safety shall have the authority to accept, budget and expend for any proper expenses of the Crime Stoppers Advisory Council any special source funds made available to the Crime Stoppers Program subject to the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and in accordance with procedures for federal fund escalations as established in Section 27-104-21.

The council shall have the authority to require financial statement reporting from any local crime stoppers program receiving any type of public funding, including, but not limited to, surcharges, assessments, fees or other funds paid directly to a local crime stoppers program by a municipal or county agency, including funds received under Section 45-39-17.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 550, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 45-39-7.
Records; confidentiality.

Council records relating to reports of criminal acts are confidential.

Evidence of a communication between a person submitting a report of a criminal act to the council or a local crime stoppers program and the person who accepted the report on behalf of the council or local crime stoppers program is not admissible in a court or an administrative proceeding whether the evidence is held by the council or a local crime stoppers program or is held by a telecommunication service provider.

Records of the council or a local crime stoppers program concerning a report of criminal activity and records of a telecommunication service provider relating to a report made to the council or to a local crime stoppers program may not be compelled to be produced before a court or other tribunal except on the motion of a criminal defendant to the court in which the offense is being tried that the records or report contain evidence that is exculpatory to the defendant in the trial of that offense. On motion of a defendant under this subsection, the court may subpoena the records or report. The court shall conduct an in-camera inspection of materials produced under subpoena to determine whether the materials contain evidence that is exculpatory to the defendant. If the court determines that the materials produced contain evidence that is exculpatory to the defendant, the court shall present the evidence to the defendant in a form that does not disclose the identity of the person who was the source of the evidence, unless the state or federal constitution requires the disclosure of that person’s identity. The court shall execute an affidavit accompanying the disclosed materials swearing that, in the opinion of the court, the materials disclosed represent the exculpatory evidence the defendant is entitled to receive under this section. The court shall return to the council or to the local crime stoppers program materials that are produced under this section but not disclosed to the defendant. The council or local crime stoppers program shall store the materials until the conclusion of the criminal trial and the expiration of the time for all direct appeals in the case.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 308, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 45-39-9.
Offenses.

A person who is a member or employee of the council or who accepts a report of criminal activity on behalf of a local crime stoppers program is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person intentionally or knowingly divulges to a person not employed by a law enforcement agency the content of a report of a criminal act or the identity of the person who made the report without the consent of the person who made the report.

A person convicted of an offense under this section shall be punished as provided in Section 99-19-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and is not eligible for state employment during the five-year period following the date that the conviction becomes final.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 45-39-11.
Establishment and operation of a toll-free telephone number for reporting information about criminal acts.

The council shall establish and operate a toll-free telephone service and make the service accessible to persons residing in areas of the state not served by a local crime stoppers program for reporting to the council information about criminal acts. The toll-free service must be available between the hours of 5:00 p.m. and 8:00 a.m. Monday through Thursday and from 5:00 p.m. Friday until 8:00 a.m. Monday. The council shall forward the information received to appropriate law enforcement agencies or local crime stoppers programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 45-39-13.
Intent.

The establishment of any Crime Stoppers Advisory Council shall not impede the intent or process of the Vulnerable Adults Acts of 1986 as provided in Section 43-47-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 45-39-15.
Local crime stoppers programs.

The board of supervisors of a county and the governing authority of a municipality are authorized to contribute funds to a local crime stoppers program from the general fund of the county or municipality or any other available source if the local crime stoppers program is established to operate, in whole or in part, within the boundaries of that county or municipality.

This chapter shall not repeal or affect any local and private act establishing a county or local crime stoppers program providing for the operation and funding of such program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 529, § 8; Laws, 2002, ch. 308, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 45-39-17.
Certain localities authorized to assess surcharge upon persons fined for certain misdemeanors to fund local crime stoppers programs.

In addition to any other monetary penalties and other penalties imposed by law, any county or municipality by ordinance may assess an additional surcharge in an amount not to exceed Two Dollars ($2.00) on each person upon whom a county, justice or municipal court imposes a fine or other penalty for any misdemeanor other than offenses relating to vehicular parking or registration if there is established to the benefit of the citizens of the county or municipality a local crime stoppers program which is not authorized to receive funds under local and private legislation. The proceeds from the surcharge may be used by a county or municipality only to fund that county’s or municipality’s support of the local crime stoppers program as authorized by Section 45-39-15, Mississippi Code of 1972. The proceeds from the surcharge imposed by this section shall be deposited into a special fund in the Department of Public Safety’s Office of Public Safety Planning which shall promulgate rules and procedures relating to the administration of the special fund and the disbursement of monies in the fund to participating counties and municipalities. The maximum amount that a county or municipality may receive from the special fund shall be an amount equal to the deposits made into the fund by that entity, less one percent (1%) to be retained by the Office of Public Safety Planning to defray the costs of administering the special fund. Interest earned on the special fund shall remain in the fund and shall be used by the Office of Public Safety Planning to further defray the costs of administering the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 308, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.